Illinois, session 104th, HB3393.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 106B-5 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/106B-5)7    Sec. 106B-5. Testimony by a victim who is a child or a 8person with a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual 9disability or a person affected by a developmental disability.10    (a) In a proceeding in the prosecution of an offense of 11criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault of 12a child, aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 13abuse, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, aggravated battery, 14or aggravated domestic battery, a court may order that the 15testimony of a victim who is a child under the age of 18 years 16or a person with a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual 17disability or a person affected by a developmental disability 18be taken outside the courtroom and shown in the courtroom by 19means of a closed circuit television if:20        (1) the testimony is taken during the proceeding; and21        (2) the judge determines that testimony by the child 22    victim or victim with a moderate, severe, or profound 23    intellectual disability or victim affected by a   HB3393 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08138 RLC 18184 b1    developmental disability in the courtroom will result in 2    the child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 3    intellectual disability or person affected by a 4    developmental disability suffering serious emotional 5    distress such that the child or person with a moderate, 6    severe, or profound intellectual disability or person 7    affected by a developmental disability cannot reasonably 8    communicate or that the child or person with a moderate, 9    severe, or profound intellectual disability or person 10    affected by a developmental disability will suffer severe 11    emotional distress that is likely to cause the child or 12    person with a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual 13    disability or person affected by a developmental 14    disability to suffer severe adverse effects.15    (b) Only the prosecuting attorney, the attorney for the 16defendant, and the judge may question the child or person with 17a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual disability or 18person affected by a developmental disability.19    (c) The operators of the closed circuit television shall 20make every effort to be unobtrusive.21    (d) Only the following persons may be in the room with the 22child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 23intellectual disability or person affected by a developmental 24disability when the child or person with a moderate, severe, 25or profound intellectual disability or person affected by a 26developmental disability testifies by closed circuit   HB3393 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08138 RLC 18184 b1television:2        (1) the prosecuting attorney;3        (2) the attorney for the defendant;4        (3) the judge;5        (4) the operators of the closed circuit television 6    equipment; and7        (5) any person or persons whose presence, in the 8    opinion of the court, contributes to the well-being of the 9    child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 10    intellectual disability or person affected by a 11    developmental disability, including a person who has dealt 12    with the child in a therapeutic setting concerning the 13    abuse, a parent or guardian of the child or person with a 14    moderate, severe, or profound intellectual disability or 15    person affected by a developmental disability, and court 16    security personnel.17    (e) During the child's or person with a moderate, severe, 18or profound intellectual disability or person affected by a 19developmental disability's testimony by closed circuit 20television, the defendant shall be in the courtroom and shall 21not communicate with the jury if the cause is being heard 22before a jury.23    (f) The defendant shall be allowed to communicate with the 24persons in the room where the child or person with a moderate, 25severe, or profound intellectual disability or person affected 26by a developmental disability is testifying by any appropriate   HB3393 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08138 RLC 18184 b1electronic method.2    (f-5) (Blank). There is a rebuttable presumption that the 3testimony of a victim who is a child under 13 years of age 4shall testify outside the courtroom and the child's testimony 5shall be shown in the courtroom by means of a closed circuit 6television. This presumption may be overcome if the defendant 7can prove by clear and convincing evidence that the child 8victim will not suffer severe emotional distress. 9    (f-6) Before the court permits the testimony of a victim 10outside the courtroom that is to be shown in the courtroom by 11means of a closed circuit television, the court must make a 12finding that the testimony by means of closed circuit 13television does not unduly prejudice the defendant. 14    (g) The provisions of this Section do not apply if the 15defendant represents himself pro se.16    (h) This Section may not be interpreted to preclude, for 17purposes of identification of a defendant, the presence of 18both the victim and the defendant in the courtroom at the same 19time.20    (i) This Section applies to prosecutions pending on or 21commenced on or after the effective date of this amendatory 22Act of 1994.23    (j) For the purposes of this Section, "developmental 24disability" includes, but is not limited to, cerebral palsy, 25epilepsy, and autism. 26(Source: P.A. 103-164, eff. 1-1-24.)